Connecticut, session 2026, HB05114.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Condominium" has the same meaning as provided in section 47-
68a of the general statutes;
(2) "Common interest community" has the same meaning as provided
in section 47-202 of the general statutes;
(3) "Dwelling unit" has the same meaning as provided in section 47a-
1 of the general statutes;
(4) "Eligible renter" means an individual (A) who rented and
occupied one or more dwelling units in the state for the entirety of the
applicable taxable year as such individual's primary residence and paid
rent for such dwelling unit or units, (B) who was not claimed as a
dependent on another individual's federal income tax return for the
applicable taxable year, and (C) whose federal adjusted gross income
for the applicable taxable year does not exceed (i) seventy-five thousand
dollars for individuals who file a return under the federal income tax as
LCO 1 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5114
an unmarried individual, a married individual filing separately or a
head of household, or (ii) one hundred fifty thousand dollars for
individuals who file a return under the federal income tax as married
individuals filing jointly;
(5) "Hotel", "lodging" and "bed and breakfast establishment" have the
same meanings as provided in section 12-407 of the general statutes;
(6) "Mobile manufactured home" has the same meaning as provided
in section 12-63a of the general statutes; and
(7) "Short-term rental" has the same meaning as provided in section
12-408h of the general statutes.
(b) Any eligible renter who is subject to the tax imposed under
chapter 229 of the general statutes for any taxable year commencing on
or after January 1, 2027, shall be allowed a credit against the tax
otherwise due under chapter 229 of the general statutes, other than the
liability imposed by section 12-707 of the general statutes, in an amount
equal to twenty per cent of the eligible renter's annual rent actually paid
by the eligible renter for the applicable taxable year, minus four per cent
of the eligible renter's federal adjusted gross income for the applicable
taxable year, provided the amount of the credit for any taxable year shall
not exceed (1) for any eligible renter who files a return under the federal
income tax as an unmarried individual, a married individual filing
separately or a head of household, two thousand five hundred dollars,
and (2) for any two eligible renters who file a return as married
individuals filing jointly, two thousand five hundred dollars jointly for
such two eligible renters.
(c) (1) Each owner or managing agent, including the owner or
managing agent of a mobile manufactured home park, of any property
in the state that is occupied by a renter as a primary residence and for
which the renter pays rent, shall furnish a certificate of rent paid to each
such renter who is a renter on December thirty-first. The certificate shall
be in such form and manner as prescribed by the Commissioner of
Revenue Services and shall be provided to each renter before February
LCO 2 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5114
first of the year following the year in which the rent was paid. Each
eligible renter claiming the credit under this section shall file such
certificate with the eligible renter's state tax filing.
(2) If a renter moves before December thirty-first, the owner or
managing agent may furnish the certificate to the renter at the time of
moving or send the certificate by mail to a forwarding address, if
known, or by electronic mail if the renter provided an electronic mail
address to the owner or managing agent.
(3) Each owner or managing agent shall retain a duplicate of each
certificate, or an equivalent record that shows the information that was
included in each certificate, for a period of four years and shall make
such duplicate or record available to the commissioner upon request.
(4) If an eligible renter does not receive a certificate from the owner
or managing agent, the eligible renter may submit an affidavit that
includes the information that would be included in a certificate of rent
paid. The Department of Revenue Services shall develop a form for the
affidavit and post such form on the department's Internet web site.
(d) If the amount of the credit allowed pursuant to this section
exceeds the taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed under chapter 229 of
the general statutes, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall treat
such excess as an overpayment and, except as provided under section
12-739 or 12-742 of the general statutes, shall refund the amount of such
excess, without interest, to the taxpayer.
(e) For the purposes of this section:
(1) "Rent" includes (A) the amount of heat, hot water, gas, electricity,
furniture and parking, to the extent the landlord makes no separate
charge for such items, and (B) the rental of a mobile manufactured home
or of the leasehold site being occupied by the taxpayer's mobile
manufactured home, or both.
(2) "Rent" does not include (A) amounts paid as a security deposit or
LCO 3 of 4

Substitute Bill No. 5114
amounts paid for the last month's rent upon entering into a rental or
lease agreement, unless such amounts are applied to unpaid rent, (B)
payments by a tenant-stockholder of a cooperative housing corporation
to such corporation, (C) payments by a tenant or an owner of a
condominium or a unit in a common interest community to the
respective unit owner association, (D) consideration paid for the
occupancy of a hotel, lodging house, bed and breakfast establishment or
short-term rental, unless such premises are occupied under a rental or
lease agreement, or (E) payment in kind by the tenant to the landlord.
(f) Commencing in the taxable year commencing January 1, 2028, and
annually thereafter, the Commissioner of Revenue Services shall submit
a report, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general
statutes, to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to finance, revenue and bonding,
of the total amount of credits claimed under this section for the previous
taxable year and such other deidentified and disclosable information
that is requested by said committee concerning the credit allowed under
this section, to enable said committee to evaluate whether any changes
should be made to the income thresholds or credit amounts set forth in
this section.
(g) The commissioner may (1) coordinate with the Department of
Housing and other state agencies to promote public awareness of the
100 credit under this section, and (2) adopt regulations, in accordance with
101 the provisions of chapter 54 of the general statutes, to implement the
102 provisions of this section.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 New section
FIN Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 4 of 4